Illinois, session 104th, SB3800.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 917 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/917)  (from Ch. 120, par. 9-917)7    Sec. 917. Confidentiality and information sharing.8    (a) Confidentiality. Except as provided in this Section, 9all information received by the Department from returns filed 10under this Act, or from any investigation conducted under the 11provisions of this Act, shall be confidential, except for 12official purposes within the Department or pursuant to 13official procedures for collection of any State tax or 14pursuant to an investigation or audit by the Illinois State 15Scholarship Commission of a delinquent student loan or 16monetary award or enforcement of any civil or criminal penalty 17or sanction imposed by this Act or by another statute imposing 18a State tax, and any person who divulges any such information 19in any manner, except for such purposes and pursuant to order 20of the Director or in accordance with a proper judicial order, 21shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. However, the 22provisions of this paragraph are not applicable to information 23furnished to (i) the Department of Healthcare and Family   SB3800- 2 -LRB104 19240 HLH 32686 b1Services (formerly Department of Public Aid), State's 2Attorneys, and the Attorney General for child support 3enforcement purposes and (ii) a licensed attorney representing 4the taxpayer where an appeal or a protest has been filed on 5behalf of the taxpayer. If it is necessary to file information 6obtained pursuant to this Act in a child support enforcement 7proceeding, the information shall be filed under seal. The 8furnishing upon request of the Auditor General, or his or her 9authorized agents, for official use of returns filed and 10information related thereto under this Act is deemed to be an 11official purpose within the Department within the meaning of 12this Section. 13    (b) Public information. Nothing contained in this Act 14shall prevent the Director from publishing or making available 15to the public the names and addresses of persons filing 16returns under this Act, or from publishing or making available 17reasonable statistics concerning the operation of the tax 18wherein the contents of returns are grouped into aggregates in 19such a way that the information contained in any individual 20return shall not be disclosed.21    (c) Governmental agencies. 22        (1) The Director may make available to the Secretary 23    of the Treasury of the United States or his delegate, or 24    the proper officer or his delegate of any other state 25    imposing a tax upon or measured by income, for exclusively 26    official purposes, information received by the Department   SB3800- 3 -LRB104 19240 HLH 32686 b1    in the administration of this Act, but such permission 2    shall be granted only if the United States or such other 3    state, as the case may be, grants the Department 4    substantially similar privileges.5        (2) The Director may exchange information with the 6    Department of Healthcare and Family Services and the 7    Department of Human Services (acting as successor to the 8    Department of Public Aid under the Department of Human 9    Services Act) for the purpose of verifying sources and 10    amounts of income and for other purposes directly 11    connected with the administration of this Act, the 12    Illinois Public Aid Code, and any other health benefit 13    program administered by the State.14        (3) The Director may exchange information with the 15    Director of the Department of Employment Security for the 16    purpose of verifying sources and amounts of income and for 17    other purposes directly connected with the administration 18    of this Act and Acts administered by the Department of 19    Employment Security.20        (4) The Director may make available to the Illinois 21    Workers' Compensation Commission information regarding 22    employers for the purpose of verifying the insurance 23    coverage required under the Workers' Compensation Act and 24    Workers' Occupational Diseases Act.25        (5) The Director may exchange information with the 26    Illinois Department on Aging for the purpose of verifying   SB3800- 4 -LRB104 19240 HLH 32686 b1    sources and amounts of income for purposes directly 2    related to confirming eligibility for participation in the 3    programs of benefits authorized by the Senior Citizens and 4    Persons with Disabilities Property Tax Relief and 5    Pharmaceutical Assistance Act.6        (6) The Director may exchange information with the 7    State Treasurer's Office and the Department of Employment 8    Security for the purpose of implementing, administering, 9    and enforcing the Illinois Secure Choice Savings Program 10    Act.11        (7) The Director may exchange information with the 12    State Treasurer's Office for the purpose of administering 13    the Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act or successor 14    Acts.15        (8) The Director may make information available to the 16    Secretary of State for the purpose of administering 17    Section 5-901 of the Illinois Vehicle Code.18        (9) The Director may exchange information with the 19    State Treasurer's Office for the purpose of administering 20    the Illinois Higher Education Savings Program established 21    under Section 16.8 of the State Treasurer Act. 22        (10) The Director may make individual income tax 23    information available to the State health benefits 24    exchange, as defined in Section 513, if the disclosure is 25    authorized by the taxpayer pursuant to Section 513. 26        (11) The Director may exchange information with the   SB3800- 5 -LRB104 19240 HLH 32686 b1    Department of Labor for the purpose of administering and 2    enforcing Acts within the Department of Labor's statutory 3    authority. 4        (12) The Director may make available to any State 5    agency, including the Illinois Supreme Court, which 6    licenses persons to engage in any occupation, information 7    that a person licensed by such agency has failed to file 8    returns under this Act or pay the tax, penalty and 9    interest shown therein, or has failed to pay any final 10    assessment of tax, penalty or interest due under this Act.11        (13) The Director may make available to any State 12    agency, including the Illinois Supreme Court, information 13    regarding whether a bidder, contractor, or an affiliate of 14    a bidder or contractor has failed to file returns under 15    this Act or pay the tax, penalty, and interest shown 16    therein, or has failed to pay any final assessment of tax, 17    penalty, or interest due under this Act, for the limited 18    purpose of enforcing bidder and contractor certifications. 19    For purposes of this Section, the term "affiliate" means 20    any entity that (1) directly, indirectly, or 21    constructively controls another entity, (2) is directly, 22    indirectly, or constructively controlled by another 23    entity, or (3) is subject to the control of a common 24    entity. For purposes of this subsection (c) (a), an entity 25    controls another entity if it owns, directly or 26    individually, more than 10% of the voting securities of   SB3800- 6 -LRB104 19240 HLH 32686 b1    that entity. As used in this subsection (c) (a), the term 2    "voting security" means a security that (1) confers upon 3    the holder the right to vote for the election of members of 4    the board of directors or similar governing body of the 5    business or (2) is convertible into, or entitles the 6    holder to receive upon its exercise, a security that 7    confers such a right to vote. A general partnership 8    interest is a voting security.9        (14) The Director may make available to any State 10    agency, including the Illinois Supreme Court, units of 11    local government, and school districts, information 12    regarding whether a bidder or contractor is an affiliate 13    of a person who is not collecting and remitting Illinois 14    Use taxes, for the limited purpose of enforcing bidder and 15    contractor certifications.16        (15) The Director may also make available to the 17    Secretary of State information that a corporation which 18    has been issued a certificate of incorporation by the 19    Secretary of State has failed to file returns under this 20    Act or pay the tax, penalty and interest shown therein, or 21    has failed to pay any final assessment of tax, penalty or 22    interest due under this Act. An assessment is final when 23    all proceedings in court for review of such assessment 24    have terminated or the time for the taking thereof has 25    expired without such proceedings being instituted. For 26    taxable years ending on or after December 31, 1987, the   SB3800- 7 -LRB104 19240 HLH 32686 b1    Director may make available to the Director or principal 2    officer of any Department of the State of Illinois, 3    information that a person employed by such Department has 4    failed to file returns under this Act or pay the tax, 5    penalty and interest shown therein. For purposes of this 6    paragraph, the word "Department" shall have the same 7    meaning as provided in Section 3 of the State Employees 8    Group Insurance Act of 1971.9    (d) The Director shall make available for public 10inspection in the Department's principal office and for 11publication, at cost, administrative decisions issued on or 12after January 1, 1995. These decisions are to be made 13available in a manner so that the following taxpayer 14information is not disclosed:15        (1) The names, addresses, and identification numbers 16    of the taxpayer, related entities, and employees.17        (2) At the sole discretion of the Director, trade 18    secrets or other confidential information identified as 19    such by the taxpayer, no later than 30 days after receipt 20    of an administrative decision, by such means as the 21    Department shall provide by rule.22    The Director shall determine the appropriate extent of the 23deletions allowed in paragraph (2). In the event the taxpayer 24does not submit deletions, the Director shall make only the 25deletions specified in paragraph (1).26    The Director shall make available for public inspection   SB3800- 8 -LRB104 19240 HLH 32686 b1and publication an administrative decision within 180 days 2after the issuance of the administrative decision. The term 3"administrative decision" has the same meaning as defined in 4Section 3-101 of Article III of the Code of Civil Procedure. 5Costs collected under this Section shall be paid into the Tax 6Compliance and Administration Fund.7    (e) Nothing contained in this Act shall prevent the 8Director from divulging information to any person pursuant to 9a request or authorization made by the taxpayer, by an 10authorized representative of the taxpayer, or, in the case of 11information related to a joint return, by the spouse filing 12the joint return with the taxpayer.13(Source: P.A. 102-61, eff. 7-9-21; 102-129, eff. 7-23-21; 14102-799, eff. 5-13-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-941, eff. 157-1-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)